District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0462.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
32 act may be cited as the “988 Lifeline Support and Sustainability Establishment Amendment Act
33 of 2025”.
34 Sec 2. The Department of Behavioral Health Establishment Act of 2013, effective
35 December 24, 2013 (D.C. Law 20-61; D.C. Official Code § 7-1141.01 et seq.), is amended by
36 adding a new part C to read as follows:
37 “PART C.
38 “Sec. 5120d. Definitions.

39 “For the purposes of this part, the term:
40 “(1) “988 Lifeline” means the 3-digit number designated as the universal
41 telephone number within the United States for the purpose of the national suicide prevention
42 and mental health crisis hotline system established by section 251(e)(4) of the Communications
43 Act of 1934, approved February 8, 1996 (110 Stat. 61; 47 U.S.C. § 251(e)(4)).
44
45 “(2) “988 Fee” means the surcharge assessed authorized under section 5120f on
46 commercial landline, mobile service and interconnected voice over internet protocol service
47 lines.
48 “(3) “Consumer” means an individual who purchases prepaid wireless
49 telecommunications service in a retail transaction for any purpose other than resale.
50 “(4) “Local exchange carrier” means a person that is engaged in the provision of
51 local exchange service or exchange access.
52 “(5) “Local exchange service” means a telecommunications service provided
53 within an exchange area.
54 “(6) “Prepaid wireless 988 charge” means the charge that is required to the
55 collected by the seller from a consumer in an amount established by section 5120g.
56 “(7) “Prepaid wireless communications service” shall have the same meaning as
57 in section 602(6B) of the Emergency and Non-Emergency Telephone Calling Systems Fund Act
58 of 2000, effective October 19, 2000 (D.C. Law 13-172; D.C. Official Code § 34-1801(6B)).
59 “(8) “Seller” means a person who sells prepaid wireless telecommunications
60 service to another person.
61 “(9) “Subscriber” means a person subscribed to local exchange services in the
62 District.

63 “(10) “Fund” means the 988 Lifeline and Crisis Services Fund established under
64 section 5120e.
65 Sec. 5120e. 988 Lifeline and Crisis Services Fund.
66 “(a) There is established as a special fund the 988 Lifeline and Crisis Services Fund,
67 which shall be administered by the Department in accordance with subsection (c) of this section.
68 “(b) Revenue from the following sources shall be deposited into the Fund:
69 “(1) Fees authorized under section 5120f, including any interest earned;
70 “(2) Fees authorized under section 5120g, including any interest earned;
71 “(3) Such amount as may be appropriated into the Fund; and
72 “(4) Grants, gifts, or subsidies from public and private sources.
73 “(c) The Fund shall be used solely to defray personnel and non-personnel costs incurred
74 by the District to implement, maintain, and improve behavioral health services in response to
75 calls to the 988 Lifeline; provided, that costs are not reimbursable through Medicaid, Medicare,
76 federal or state-regulated health insurance plans, or disability insurers, including:
77 “(1) Staffing and technological infrastructure enhancements necessary to achieve
78 operational and clinical standards and best practices established by the Department; and
79 “(2) The provision of a continuum of behavioral health crisis response services in
80 the District, including mobile crisis team services, crisis stabilization centers, other acute
81 behavioral health care services, outreach, and receiving and stabilization services.
82 “(d)(1) The money deposited into the Fund shall not revert to the unrestricted fund
83 balance of the General Fund of the District of Columbia at the end of a fiscal year, or at any other
84 time.

85 “(2) Subject to authorization in an approved budget and financial plan, any funds
86 appropriated in the Fund shall be continually available without regard to fiscal year limitation.
87 “(e)(1) The Mayor shall submit to the Council, as part of the annual budget and financial
88 plan, a requested appropriations for expenditures from the Fund.
89 “(2) As part of the annual appropriation request, the Mayor shall provide a report
90 to the Council addressing whether the 988 fee imposed under section 5120f should be adjusted.
91 “(f) All revenue and expenditures of the Fund shall be audited annually by the Chief
92 Financial Officer, who shall transmit the results of the annual audit to the Mayor and the Council.
93 The audit shall include an itemized list of how funds were spent, and assessment of whether
94 expenditures comply with the National Suicide Hotline Designation Act and FCC guidance,
95 internal controls in place to prevent misuse, and a list of providers required to collect and remit
96 the fees.”.
97 “Sec. 5120f. 988 fee assessments.
98 “(a) There is imposed upon all subscribers to local exchange carriers, including wireline
99 and wireless carriers and interconnected Voice Over Internet Protocol (“VoIP”) service providers
100 that connect users who dial or enter the digits 9-8-8 to the 988 Lifeline, a monthly 988 fee as
101 follows:
102 “(1) For wireline local exchange service:
103 “(A) A fee of $0.76 per exchange access line in the District;
104 “(B) A fee of $0.62 per Centrex line in the District; and
105 “(C) A fee of $0.62 per private branch exchange station in the District.
106 “(2) For wireless exchange service, $0.76 for each telephone number that has a
107 District billing address.

108 “(3) For interconnected VoIP service, as defined by 47 C.F.R. § 9.3, $0.76 for
109 each line, trunk, or path that can access to, connect with, or interface with 988 service based on
110 primary place of use.
111 “(b) For purposes of the 988 fee imposed under this section, each individual line
112 associated with a family or shared wireless service plan shall be subject to the 988 fee; provided,
113 that no more than 5 lines per family or shared plan shall be assessed the fee.
114 “(c) The PBX tax per station shall be converted into a per-trunk tax based on a ratio of 15
115 PBX stations to one PBX trunk.
116 “(d)(1) Each local exchange carrier shall collect the 988 fee imposed under
117 subsection (a) of this section on behalf of the subscriber and shall remit the proceeds to the
118 Mayor on a quarterly basis; except, that a local exchange carrier may deduct and retain an
119 amount not to exceed 2% of the user fees collected to cover administrative costs.
120 “(2) Each local exchange carrier shall state on the invoice to customers a
121 separate line item stating the amount of 988 fee levied pursuant to this section.“(3) 988 fees
122 collected under this section shall not be considered revenue of a local exchange carrier for any
123 purpose.
124 “(e) Payment of the user fees imposed under subsection (a) of this section shall not be
125 subject to taxes or charges levied by the District of Columbia.
126 “(f) The provisions of this section shall not apply to prepaid wireless
127 telecommunications service, which shall be subject to the provisions of section 5120g.
128 “Sec. 5120g. Collection and remittance of prepaid wireless 988 charge.

129 “(a)(1) A prepaid wireless 988 charge of 2% of the sales price per retail transaction
130 occurring in the District shall be collected by the seller from the consumer and remitted to the
131 District.
132 “(2) The amount of the prepaid wireless 988 charge shall be separately stated on
133 an invoice, receipt, or other similar document that is provided to the consumer by the seller.
134 “(3) For purposes of this subsection, a retail transaction that is effected in person
135 by a consumer at a business location of the seller shall be treated as in as occurring in the District
136 if that business location is in the District and any other retail transaction shall be treated as
137 occurring in the District if the retail transaction is a sale at retail described in D.C. Official Code
138 § 47-2001(n)(1)(T) that is subject to tax pursuant to D.C. Official Code § 47-2002.
139 “(b)(1) The prepaid wireless 988 charge shall be the liability of the consumer and not of
140 the seller or of any provider; except, that the seller shall be liable to remit all prepaid wireless
141 988 charges that the seller collects from consumers, including all such charges that the seller is
142 deemed to collect where the amount of the charge has not been separately stated on an invoice,
143 receipt, or other similar document provided to the consumer by the seller.
144 “(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1) of this subsection, a seller shall be permitted
145 to deduct and retain 3% of prepaid wireless 988 charges that are collected by the seller from
146 consumers.
147 “(c) If the amount of the prepaid wireless 988 charge that is collected by a seller from a
148 consumer is separately states on an invoice, receipt, or other similar document provided to the
149 consumer by the seller, the amount shall not be included in the base for measuring any tax, fee,
150 surcharge, or other charge that is imposed by the District.

151 “(d) When prepaid wireless telecommunications service is sold with one or more other
152 products or services for a single, non-itemized price, the percentage of the prepaid wireless 988
153 charge specified in this section shall apply to the entire non-itemized price, unless the seller
154 elects to apply the percentage to:
155 “(1) The amount of the prepaid wireless telecommunications service disclosed to
156 the consumer as a dollar amount; or
157 “(2) The portion of the price identified by the seller that is attributable to the
158 prepaid wireless telecommunications service by reasonable and verifiable standards from the
159 seller’s books and records that are kept in the regular course of business for other purposes,
160 including non-tax purposes.
161 “(e)(1) Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, if a minimal amount of prepaid
162 wireless telecommunications service is sold with a prepaid wireless device for a single, non-
163 itemized price, the seller may elect not to apply the percentage in this section to the transaction.
164 “(2) For purposes of this subsection, the term “minimal amount” means an
165 amount of service denominated as 10 minutes or less, or $5 or less.
166 “(f) The Office of Tax and Revenue, pursuant to Title I of the District of Columbia
167 Administrative Procedure Act, approved October 21, 1968 (82 Stat. 1204; D.C. Official Code §
168 2-501 et seq.), shall issue rules governing the collection of, remittance of, and other
169 administrative provisions related to the prepaid wireless 988 charge established by this section.
170 The rules shall be consistent with existing provisions governing the collection, remittance, and
171 administration of the tax imposed by D.C. Official Code § 47-2002.
172 “Sec. 5120i. Rules.

173 “The Mayor, pursuant to Title I of the District of Columbia Administrative Procedure Act,
174 approved October 21, 1968 (82 Stat. 1204; D.C. Official Code § 2-501 et seq.), shall issue rules
175 to implement the provisions of this part.”.
176 Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
177 The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
178 impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
179 approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
180 Sec. 4. Effective date.
181 This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
182 Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional
183 review as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved
184 December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1- 206.02(c)(1)).